Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1003
Sale at auction; false statements; liability.

The owner of commercial chicks desiring to sell them at public auction shall furnish to the person who conducts the sale a duplicate of the sworn statement required by section 69-1002, which shall be retained by the person conducting the sale. When such copy of the sworn statement has been furnished to him, the person conducting the sale shall be relieved from any responsibility or liability concerning incorrect or false statements made in regard to such commercial chicks.

Laws 1967, c. 414, § 3, p. 1280.